Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-313
Violations; penalty.

Any person operating pumps, or providing channels, or altering natural conditions in any way, by which the waters and valuable substances upon or in public lands and waters of the state are taken, drained or removed, without first securing approval of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, shall be deemed guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and subject to an additional fine equal to the value of the product taken.

Laws 1918, Thirty-sixth Spec. Sess., c. 7, § 14, p. 48;

C.S.1922, § 5232;

C.S.1929, § 72-313;

R.S.1943, § 72-313;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 179.